Tennessee, session 114, SB1733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 14 of the Private Acts of 2011, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting Section 3 of Chapter 8 and substituting the following:
Section 3. The City Recorder. A City Recorder shall be appointed by the Mayor,
subject to confirmation by the Board of Mayor and Aldermen, to serve as financial agent
of the City and custodian of funds, budgets, and records. This officer shall work under
the immediate direction of the Mayor for an indefinite term. The Recorder or his or her
designees shall keep and preserve the City Seal and all official records not required by
law or ordinance to be filed elsewhere; attend all meetings of the Board and keep a full
and accurate record preserved in permanent form of all business transacted by the
Board; administer functions for necessary and proper municipal operations; make such
reports of the finances of the City as required and called on by the Mayor and Board;
access and collect all taxes and fees due the City; and conduct other such duties as
required by the Mayor and Board. The City Recorder shall, within six (6) months of his
or her appointment to the office of City Recorder, be a resident of Gibson County and he
or she shall maintain such residency throughout his or her employment as City
Recorder.
SECTION 2. Chapter 14 of the Private Acts of 2011, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting Section 5 of Chapter 8 and substituting the following:
Section 5. The Chief of Police. A Chief of Police shall be appointed by the
Mayor, subject to confirmation by the Board of Mayor and Aldermen, to serve as the
SB1733
009894
- 1 -

chief law enforcement officer for the City. The Police Chief shall work under the
immediate direction of the Mayor and shall serve for an indefinite term. The Chief of
Police or his or her designees shall administer functions for necessary and proper police
department operations; arrest all persons violating the criminal laws of the State in
accordance with the general law of the State or issue a citation for a violation of any
ordinances of the City of Trenton; take any person before an authorized person by law
for trial or examination; and have all the power, authority, duty, and jurisdiction. The
Chief of Police shall, within six (6) months of his or her appointment to the office of Chief
of Police, be a resident of Gibson County and he or she shall maintain such residency
throughout his or her employment as Chief of Police.
SECTION 3. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Trenton. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 3.
- 2 - 009894